New Jersey, session 221, A1052.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The superintendent shall issue a tourniquet to every State trooper. b.    The tourniquets required by subsection a. of this section may be funded by forfeiture funds collected pursuant to N.J.S.2C:64-6, in an amount to be determined by the Attorney General. c.     The Attorney General is authorized to promulgate guidelines or directives, as appropriate, to implement and enforce the provisions of this section. 2.    a.  The chief law enforcement officer of a county or municipal police department shall issue a tourniquet to every law enforcement officer in that county or municipal police department. b.    The tourniquets required by subsection a. of this section may be funded by forfeiture funds collected pursuant to N.J.S.2C:64-6, in an amount to be determined by the Attorney General. c.     The Attorney General is authorized to promulgate guidelines or directives, as appropriate, to implement and enforce the provisions of this section. 3.    a.  For the purposes of this section: "Basic life support ambulance" means an emergency medical services vehicle that is licensed by the New Jersey Department of Health and operated in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner. In-service means the presence of a mobility assistance vehicle or basic life support ambulance at a sending or receiving health care facility; the picking up, transporting, or discharging of any patient; or any instance where the mobility assistance vehicle or basic life support ambulance is ready to accept patients and perform mobility assistance or basic life support care. "Mobility assistance vehicle" means a specialized transport vehicle licensed by the New Jersey Department of Health and operated in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commissioner. b.    In addition to basic equipment and supplies required by the Commissioner of Health, every basic life support ambulance and mobility assistance vehicle shall be equipped with a tourniquet while in-service. c.     The Commissioner of Health is authorized to promulgate guidelines or directives, as appropriate, to implement and enforce the provisions of this section. 4.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month following enactment.